Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.060

Resolution consenting to readjustment.

No final decree or order of such United States district court confirming a plan of readjustment shall be effective for the purpose of binding such taxing district unless and until such taxing district files with such court a certified copy of a resolution of such taxing district, adopted by it or by the officer or officers, board, council or commission referred to in RCW 39.64.030, consenting to the plan of readjustment set forth or referred to in such final decree or order.

[ 1935 c 143 s 7; RRS s 5608-7.]